Maryland, session 2026, HB0192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0192*

HOUSE BILL 192
10–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Commission” means the Maryland Higher Education Commission.
11–202.1.
(b) (1) Subject to the requirements imposed by this section, and except as
prohibited in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a religious educational institution may
operate without a certificate of approval from the Commission and may enroll Maryland
students in a fully online distance education program in the State without a registration
from the Commission if the institution:
(i) Is established for religious educational purposes;
(ii) Provides educational programs only for religious vocations or
purposes;
(iii) Offers only sectarian instruction designed for and aimed at
individuals who hold or seek to learn the particular religious faiths or beliefs taught by the
institution; and
(iv) States on the certificate or diploma the religious nature of the
award.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A RELIGIOUS
EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION THAT WAS AUTHORIZED TO OPERATE IN THE STATE
AND HAS BEEN IN CONTINUOUS OPERATION IN THE STATE SINCE BEFORE JANUARY
1, 2013.
(II) A religious educational institution that is accredited by an
accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education may not operate
without a certificate of approval from the Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.